local/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="sco/ate__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>t</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>atem</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ateți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>t</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>team</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>teai</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>tea</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
        <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>team</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>teați</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>teau</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>sesem</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseși</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>sese</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
        <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>sesem</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseră</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>t</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ată</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>atem</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ateți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ată</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>  
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>asă</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>și</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ase</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>țându</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>țând</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>țând</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ată</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>atem</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ateți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ateți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ată</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

<e lm="scoate">
        <i>sco</i>
        <par n="sco/ate__vblex"/>
      </e>
  <e lm="scoate din luptă" a="mioara">
        <i>sco</i>
        <par n="sco/ate__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>din<b/>luptă</l>
	  <r><g><b/>din<b/>luptă</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="scoate la iveală" a="mioara">
        <i>sco</i>
        <par n="sco/ate__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>la<b/>iveală</l>
	  <r><g><b/>la<b/>iveală</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
